Oklahoma, session 2026, HB1781.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1914 of Title 69, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. The Oklahoma Turnpike Authority may only engage in
advertising through the following means:
1. Printed or electronic billing statements issued to users of
the turnpike system.
2. Websites and social media platforms owned, operated, or
maintained by the Authority.
3. On road signage located:

Req. No. 11019 Page 1

a. on turnpike frontage owned or controlled by the
Authority, or
b. within a distance not to exceed one and one-half (1.5)
miles from access roads, interchanges, or lead roads
to a turnpike, provided the signage is installed in
compliance with local zoning and state transportation
laws.
B. The Oklahoma Turnpike Authority is prohibited from:
1. Disseminating advertisements through mediums not specified
in subsection A of this section, including, but not limited to
television, radio, print newspapers, and third-party digital
platforms; and
2. Placing advertisements on signage or structures located
beyond the one-and-one-half-mile limit specified in subsection A of
this section.
C. This section shall not be construed to limit the Authority's
ability to advertise for bids for construction-related projects.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.

60-1-11019 JBH 01/15/25




Req. No. 11019 Page 2